Utah statutes.
7-2-11.   Special counsel -- Employment by attorney general.

Upon taking possession of any institution or other person subject to the jurisdiction of the department, the commissioner may request the attorney general to employ special counsel on his behalf to assist and advise him in connection with a liquidation or reorganization proceeding and the prosecution or defense of any action or proceeding connected with it.

